Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 8
DIRECT FILING AND TRANSFER HEARINGS

19-2.5-801. Direct filing - definition.

A juvenile may be charged by the direct filing of an information in the district court or by indictment only if the juvenile is sixteen years of age or older at the time of the commission of the alleged offense and:

Is alleged to have committed a class 1 or class 2 felony; or

Is alleged to have committed a sexual assault that is a crime of violence pursuant to section 18-1.3-406 or a sexual assault under the circumstances described in section 18-3-402 (5)(a); or

Is alleged to have committed a felony enumerated as a crime of violence pursuant to section 18-1.3-406, other than a sexual assault as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, or is alleged to have committed sexual assault pursuant to section 18-3-402,
sexual assault on a child pursuant to section 18-3-405, or sexual assault on a child by one in a position of trust pursuant to section 18-3-405.3; and

Is found to have a prior adjudicated felony offense; or

Has previously been subject to proceedings in district court as a result of a direct filing pursuant to this section or a transfer pursuant to section 19-2.5-802; except that:

If the juvenile is found not guilty in district court of the prior felony or any lesser included offense, the subsequent charge must be remanded to the juvenile court; and

If the juvenile is convicted in district court in the prior case of a lesser included or nonenumerated offense for which criminal charges could not have been originally filed by information or indictment in the district court pursuant to this section,
the subsequent charge may be remanded to the juvenile court.

If, after a preliminary hearing, the district court does not find probable cause for an offense that may be charged by direct filing, or if the direct file eligible offense is dismissed at a later date, the court shall remand the case to the juvenile
court.

Notwithstanding section 19-2.5-802, after filing charges in the juvenile court but before the juvenile court conducts a transfer hearing, the district attorney may file the same or different charges against the juvenile by direct filing of an information
in the district court or by indictment pursuant to this section. Upon the filing or indictment in the district court, the juvenile court no longer has jurisdiction over proceedings concerning the charges.

After a juvenile case has been charged by direct filing of information or by an indictment in district court, the juvenile may file in district court a motion to transfer the case to juvenile court. The juvenile must file the motion no later than the
time to request a preliminary hearing. Upon receipt of the motion, the court shall set the reverse-transfer hearing with the preliminary hearing. The court shall permit the district attorney to file a response to the juvenile's
motion to transfer the case to juvenile court. The district attorney shall file the response no later than fourteen days before the reverse-transfer hearing.

In determining whether the juvenile and the community would be better served by adjudicative proceedings pursuant to this article 2.5 or by proceedings pursuant to title 16, the court shall consider the following factors:

The seriousness of the alleged offense and whether the protection of the community requires response or consequence beyond that afforded by this article 2.5;

Whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated, or willful manner;

Whether the alleged offense was against persons or property, greater weight being given to offenses against persons;

The age of the juvenile and the maturity of the juvenile, as determined by considerations of the juvenile's home, environment, emotional attitude, and pattern of living;

The juvenile's record and previous history in prior court-related matters;

The juvenile's current and past mental health status, as evidenced by relevant mental health or psychological assessments or screenings that are made available to both the district attorney and defense counsel;

The likelihood of the juvenile's rehabilitation by use of the sentencing options available in the juvenile courts and district courts;

The interest of the community in the imposition of a punishment commensurate with the gravity of the offense;

The impact of the offense on the victim;

Whether the juvenile was previously committed to the department of human services following an adjudication for a delinquent act that constitutes a felony; and

Whether the juvenile used, or possessed and threatened the use of, a deadly weapon in the commission of the delinquent act.

If the district court determines pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section that the juvenile and the community would be better served by adjudicative proceedings pursuant to this article 2.5, the court shall enter an order directing that the offenses
against the juvenile be adjudicated in juvenile court pursuant to this article 2.5.

If a juvenile is convicted following the filing of criminal charges by information or indictment in the district court pursuant to this section, the district judge shall sentence the juvenile either:

As an adult; except that a juvenile is excluded from the mandatory minimum sentencing provisions in section 18-1.3-406, unless the juvenile is convicted of a class 1 felony or a sex offense that is subject to part 9 of article 1.3 of title 18; or

To the youthful offender system in the department of corrections in accordance with section 18-1.3-407; except that a juvenile is ineligible for sentencing to the youthful offender system if the juvenile is convicted of:

A class 1 felony;

Any sexual offense described in section 18-6-301 or 18-6-302 or part 4 of article 3 of title 18; or

A second or subsequent offense, if the juvenile received a sentence to the department of corrections or to the youthful offender system for the prior offense.

The district court judge may sentence a juvenile pursuant to this article 2.5 if the juvenile is convicted of a lesser included or nonenumerated felony offense for which criminal charges could not have been originally filed by information or indictment
in the district court pursuant to this section. If the juvenile is convicted of only a misdemeanor offense or misdemeanor offenses, the court shall adjudicate the juvenile a delinquent and sentence the juvenile pursuant
to this article 2.5.

If a juvenile is convicted of an offense that is not eligible for district court jurisdiction pursuant to either this section or section 19-2.5-802, the juvenile must be remanded to juvenile court.

In the case of a person who is sentenced as a juvenile pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the following provisions apply:

Section 19-2.5-1126 (1)(a), regarding mandatory sentence offenders;

Section 19-2.5-1126 (1)(b), regarding repeat juvenile offenders;

Section 19-2.5-1126 (1)(c), regarding violent juvenile offenders; and

Sections 19-2.5-503 and 19-2.5-1127, regarding aggravated juvenile offenders.

The court in its discretion may appoint a guardian ad litem for a juvenile charged by the direct filing of an information in the district court or by indictment pursuant to this section.

When a juvenile is sentenced pursuant to this article 2.5, the juvenile's conviction must be adjudicated as a juvenile delinquency adjudication.

For purposes of this section, "violent juvenile offender" has the same meaning as set forth in section 19-2.5-1125 (3).

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 614, § 2, effective October 1; (1) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2800, § 16, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-517 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-802. Transfers.

The juvenile court may enter an order certifying a juvenile to be held for criminal proceedings in the district court if:

A petition filed in juvenile court alleges the juvenile is:

Twelve or thirteen years of age at the time of the commission of the alleged offense and is a juvenile delinquent by virtue of having committed a delinquent act that constitutes a class 1 or class 2 felony or a crime of violence, as defined in section
18-1.3-406; or

Fourteen years of age or older at the time of the commission of the alleged offense and is a juvenile delinquent by virtue of having committed a delinquent act that constitutes a felony; and

After investigation and a hearing, the juvenile court finds it would be contrary to the best interests of the juvenile or of the public to retain jurisdiction.

A petition may be transferred from the juvenile court to the district court only after a hearing as provided in this section.

If the crime alleged to have been committed is a felony defined by section 18-8-208, and no other crime is alleged to have been committed and the juvenile has been adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for a delinquent act that constitutes a class 4 or 5
felony, then the charge for the crime may not be filed directly in the district court, but the juvenile court may transfer the charge to the district court pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.

If a juvenile is convicted in cases in which criminal charges are transferred to the district court pursuant to this section, the district court judge shall sentence the juvenile either:

As an adult; except that a juvenile is excluded from the mandatory minimum sentencing provisions in section 18-1.3-406, unless the juvenile is convicted of a class 1 felony or a sex offense that is subject to part 9 of article 1.3 of title 18; or

To the youthful offender system in the department of corrections in accordance with section 18-1.3-407; except that a juvenile is not eligible for sentencing to the youthful offender system if the juvenile is convicted of a class 1 felony; any sexual
offense described in section 18-6-301 or 18-6-302, or part 4 of article 3 of title 18; or a second or subsequent offense, if the juvenile received a sentence to the department of corrections or to the youthful
offender system for the prior offense.

The district court judge may sentence a juvenile pursuant to this article 2.5 if the juvenile is convicted of a lesser included or nonenumerated felony offense in cases in which criminal charges are transferred to the district court pursuant to this section.
If the juvenile is convicted of only a misdemeanor offense or misdemeanor offenses, the court shall adjudicate the juvenile a delinquent and sentence the juvenile pursuant to this article 2.5.

If a juvenile is convicted of an offense that is not eligible for district court jurisdiction pursuant to either this section or section 19-2.5-801, the juvenile shall be remanded to juvenile court for sentencing pursuant to this article 2.5.

In the case of a person who is sentenced as a juvenile pursuant to this subsection (1)(d), the following provisions apply:

Section 19-2.5-1126 (1)(a), regarding mandatory sentence offenders;

Section 19-2.5-1126 (1)(b), regarding repeat juvenile offenders;

Section 19-2.5-1126 (1)(c), regarding violent juvenile offenders; and

Section 19-2.5-1127, regarding aggravated juvenile offenders.

The court in its discretion may appoint a guardian ad litem for a juvenile following the transfer of charges to the district court pursuant to this section.

When a juvenile is sentenced pursuant to this article 2.5, the juvenile's conviction shall be adjudicated as a juvenile delinquency adjudication.

For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "violent juvenile offender" has the same meaning as defined in section 19-2.5-1125 (3).

Whenever a juvenile under the age of fourteen years is sentenced pursuant to section 18-1.3-401 as provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section, the department of corrections shall contract with the department of human services to house and provide services
to the juvenile in a facility operated by the department of human services until the juvenile reaches the age of fourteen years. On reaching the age of fourteen years, the juvenile must be transferred to an appropriate
facility operated by the department of corrections for the completion of the juvenile's sentence.

After filing charges in the juvenile court but prior to the time that the juvenile court conducts a transfer hearing, the district attorney may file the same or different charges against the juvenile by direct filing of an information in the district
court or by indictment pursuant to section 19-2.5-801. Upon the filing or indictment in the district court, the juvenile court no longer has jurisdiction over proceedings concerning the charges.

At the transfer hearing, the court shall consider:

Whether there is probable cause to believe that the juvenile has committed a delinquent act for which waiver of juvenile court jurisdiction over the juvenile and transfer to the district court may be sought pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
and

Whether the interests of the juvenile or of the community would be better served by the juvenile court's waiving its jurisdiction over the juvenile and transferring jurisdiction over the juvenile to the district court.

The hearing must be conducted as set forth in section 19-1-106, and the court shall make certain that the juvenile and the juvenile's parents, guardian, or legal custodian have been fully informed of their right to be represented by counsel.

In considering whether to waive juvenile court jurisdiction over the juvenile, the juvenile court shall consider the following factors:

The seriousness of the offense and whether the protection of the community requires isolation of the juvenile beyond that afforded by juvenile facilities;

Whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated, or willful manner;

Whether the alleged offense was against persons or property, greater weight being given to offenses against persons;

The juvenile's maturity, as determined by considerations of the juvenile's home, environment, emotional attitude, and pattern of living;

The juvenile's record and previous history;

The likelihood of the juvenile's rehabilitation by use of facilities available to the juvenile court;

The interest of the community in the imposition of a punishment commensurate with the gravity of the offense;

The impact of the offense on the victim;

Whether the juvenile was twice previously adjudicated a delinquent juvenile for delinquent acts that constitute felonies;

Whether the juvenile was previously adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for a delinquent act that constitutes a crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406;

Whether the juvenile was previously committed to the department of human services following an adjudication for a delinquent act that constitutes a felony;

Whether the juvenile is sixteen years of age or older at the time of the offense and the present act constitutes a crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406;

Whether the juvenile is sixteen years of age or older at the time of the offense and has been twice previously adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for delinquent acts against property that constitute felonies; and

Whether the juvenile used, or possessed and threatened the use of, a deadly weapon in the commission of a delinquent act.

The amount of weight to be given to each of the factors listed in subsection (4)(b) of this section is discretionary with the court; except that a record of two or more previously sustained petitions for delinquent acts that constitute felonies or a record
of two or more juvenile probation revocations based on acts that constitute felonies establish prima facie evidence that to retain jurisdiction in juvenile court would be contrary to the best interests of the juvenile or
of the community.

The insufficiency of evidence pertaining to any one or more of the factors listed in subsection (4)(b) of this section is not in and of itself determinative of the issue of waiver of juvenile court jurisdiction.

Written reports and other materials relating to the juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and social history may be considered by the court, but the court, if so requested by the juvenile, the juvenile's parent or guardian, or other interested party,
shall require the person or agency preparing the report and other material to appear and be subject to both direct and cross-examination.

If the court finds that its jurisdiction over a juvenile should be waived, it shall enter an order to that effect; except that such order of waiver is null and void if the district attorney fails to file an information in the criminal division of the
district court within five days after issuance of the written order of waiver, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays. Upon failure of the district attorney to file an information within five days of the issuance
of the written order of waiver, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays, the juvenile court shall retain jurisdiction and shall proceed pursuant to this article 2.5.

As a condition of the waiver of jurisdiction, the court in its discretion may provide that a juvenile shall continue to be held in custody pending the filing of an information in the criminal division of the district court. Where the juvenile has made
bond in proceedings in the juvenile court, the bond may be continued and made returnable in and transmitted to the district court, where it must continue in full force and effect unless modified by order of the district
court.

If the court finds that it is in the best interests of the juvenile and of the public for the court to retain jurisdiction, it shall proceed with the adjudicatory trial pursuant to part 9 of this article 2.5.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 618, § 2, effective October 1; (1)(d) R&RE, (HB 21-1091), ch. 175, p. 956, § 4, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-518 as it existed prior to 2021.